Wyoming statutes. Title 4 Trusts
Chapter 2 Uniform Act for Simplification of Fiduciary [Renumbered]

§§ 4-2-101 through 4-2-111.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered by Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

Sections

4-2-101

through 4-2-111 were renumbered as §§

2-3-701

through 2-3-707, which were subsequently repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 63, § 4.